Washington statutes.
RCW 2.24.020

Oath.

Court commissioners appointed hereunder shall, before entering upon the duties of such office, take and subscribe an oath to support the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of the state of Washington, and to perform the duties of such office fairly and impartially and to the best of his or her ability.

[ 2011 c 336 s 38; 1909 c 124 s 5; RRS s 88.]